Washington statutes.
RCW 6.28.010

Court may appoint, when.

The several superior courts may, whenever it is necessary, appoint a commissioner to convey real estate:

(1) When by a judgment in an action, a party is ordered to convey real property to another, or any interest therein.

(2) When real property, or any interest therein, has been sold under a special order of the court and the purchase money paid therefor.

[Code 1881 s 528; 1877 p 111 s 532; 1854 p 205 s 390; RRS s 605.]